Utah statutes.
16-6a-1608.   Statement of person named as director or officer.

Any person named as a director or officer of a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation in an annual report or other document on file with the division may, if that person does not hold the named position, deliver to the division for filing a statement setting forth:

(1)  that person's name;

(2)  the domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation's name;

(3)  information sufficient to identify the report or other document in which the person is named as a director or officer; and

(4) (a)  the date on which the person ceased to be a director or officer of the domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation; or

(b)  a statement that the person did not hold the position for which the person was named in the corporate report or other document.

